Illinois, session 104th, SB3661.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act is 5amended by adding Section 17.3 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3305/17.3 new)7    Sec. 17.3. Federal Aid Disaster Fund. The Federal Aid 8Disaster Fund Trust Fund is a federal trust fund in the State 9treasury. The Trust Fund shall be held separate and apart from 10all public moneys or funds of this State and shall be used for 11receipt of federal funds for disaster preparedness, response, 12and recovery activities. Interest earned by the investment or 13deposit of moneys accumulated in the Trust Fund shall be 14deposited into the Trust Fund. The Agency is authorized to 15expend any moneys in the Trust Fund for the specific purposes 16established by the terms and conditions of federal awards 17received by the Agency and in any amount that the Agency deems 18necessary to make grants and pay expenses in connection with 19its emergency management and preparedness programs. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.